Hawaii, session 2025, SB622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 342H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§342H- Dust monitoring; requirements.  (a)  The owner or operator of each new municipal solid waste landfill unit shall install and maintain sufficient dust monitoring stations. (b)  The owner or operator shall periodically report the data collected from the dust monitoring stations to the department of health. (c)  No later than January 1, 2026, the department of health shall adopt rules under chapter 91 that: (1)  Establish minimum standards and quantities of dust monitoring stations for municipal solid waste landfill units; (2)  Establish a deadline for the dust monitoring stations to be installed and operating; (3)  Establish the required frequency for reporting the data from dust monitoring stations to the department of health; (4)  Establish acceptable dust levels; and (5)  Establish corrective courses of action when dust levels exceed acceptable levels. The department of health may adopt additional rules under chapter 91 for purposes of this section, including rules for the public disclosure of the data from the dust monitoring stations." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________